Hawaii, session 2025, GM1128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the State first
began regulating midwives in 1931 by establishing a registration
(
requirement, which subsequently progressed to certification and
finally, licensure. However, the regulation of midwives was
repealed when, in 1998, nurse-midwives were placed under the
purview of the board of nursing. Despite the lack of
regulation, many individuals continued to practice midwifery and
many families in the community sought out midwifery services.
The legislature also finds that, per the Hawaii Regulatory
Licensing Reform Act, the State is required to regulate
professions or vocations where the health, safety, or welfare of
the consumer may be jeopardized by the nature of the service
offered by the provider. In 1998 and 2017, the legislature
requested the state auditor to conduct a sunrise analysis to
determine if regulation of midwives was warranted. While the
sunrise analysis conducted in 1998 through 1999 and reported in
Auditor's Report No. 99-14 determined that it was premature to
20-25-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx
iiiiiiiniiiiiniiiiiiiniiiiBiiiiiii^

Page 2
H.B. NO.
regulate midwives at that time, that report and the 2017
Auditor's Report No. 17-01 both determined that the nature of
the maternity and prenatal services provided by a midwife may
endanger the health and safety of women and newborns under the
midwife's care and, therefore, the profession of midwifery
should be subject to regulation. The Auditor's Report No. 17-01
in particular recommended the legislature consider establishing
a mandatory licensing framework for all midwives. Recognizing
the potential for harm to public health and safety posed by the
unregulated practice of midwifery, the legislature passed Act
32, Session Laws of Hawaii 2019 {Act 32), and established a
regulatory framework for the practice of midwifery that was
subsequently codified at chapter 457J, Hawaii Revised Statutes
(chapter 457J). Since the passage of Act 32, approximately
forty-one individuals have been licensed under chapter 457J.
These regulations are set to sunset on June 30, 2025, unless the
legislature takes action to continue the regulation of midwives.
The legislature further finds that, as part of its sunset
analysis, and reported in Auditor's Summary Report No. 25-03
(2025), the auditor found that the practice of midwifery posed a
clear and significant potential harm to the health and safety of
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx

Page 3
H.B. NO.
the public and that the State's policies regarding the
regulation of certain types of professions support the continued
regulation of the practice of midwifery in the form of full
licensure.
The legislature affirms that the practice of midwifery
under this Act does not include Native Hawaiian traditional and
customary practices. The legislature also affirms that
practicing midwifery according to this Act does not impede one's
ability to incorporate or provide cultural practices.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Make regulatory laws for the practice of midwifery
permanent;
(2) Clarify the scope of practice of midwifery and
establish licensure requirements for certified
midwives and certified professional midwives,
including continuing education requirements;
(3) Grant global signature authority to midwives;
(4) Grant prescriptive authority to certified midwives and
amend the list of approved legend drugs that may be
administered by licensed midwives;
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 3

Page 4
H.B. NO. S’
h i
(5) Establish peer review and data submission requirements
for midwives;
(6) Affirm that the practice of midwifery does not include
Native Hawaiian traditional and customary practices;
(7) Clarify exemptions from licensure and grounds for
refusal to grant, renew, reinstate, or restore
licenses or for revocation, suspension, denial, or
condition of a license; and
(8) Clarify medical record availability and retention
requirements for the purposes of medical torts.
SECTION 2. Chapter 457J, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding eight new sections to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§4 57J-A Scope of practice of midwifery. (a) The scope
of practice of midwifery means the full practice of midwifery,
regardless of compensation or personal profit, as determined by
the director, rules adopted by the director, and midwifery
standards established or recognized by the director pursuant to
this chapter. The scope of practice of midwifery shall be based
on and be consistent with a midwife's education and national
certification, including but not limited to:
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 4

Page 5
H.B. NO.
O.U. V
(1) Evaluating the physical and psychosocial health status
of clients through a comprehensive health history
intake, physical examination, and risk assessment
based on observation, inspection, palpation,
percussion, and auscultation, of the client or clients
and using diagnostic instruments and procedures;
(2) Formulating a diagnosis;
(3) Observation, assessment, development, implementation,
and evaluation of a plan of care;
(4) Providing education and counseling related to the
health promotion, disease prevention, and health care
of midwife clients, with a particular focus on a
healthy pregnancy and childbirth, the postpartum
period, care of the newborn, and the family planning
and gynecological needs of midwife clients;
(5) Obtaining informed consent, as required by section
671-3, in accordance with the midwife's professional
requirements;
(6) Supervision and teaching of other personnel;
(7) Teaching of individuals, families, and groups;
(8) Provision of midwifery services via telehealth;
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 5

Page 6
H.B. NO. E
S.D. 3
191 Administration, evaluation, supervision, and
coordination, including the delegation of
administrative and technical clinical tasks, of
midwifery practice;
1101 Provision of health care to the client in
collaboration with other members of the health care
team as autonomous health care professionals providing
the midwifery component of health care,-
1111 Serving as a consultant and resource of midwifery
clinical knowledge and skills to those involved
directly or indirectly in client care;
1121 Operating within a health care system that provides
for consultation, collaborative management, and
referral with other health care professionals;
(13) Referring clients who require care beyond the scope of
practice of the midwife to an appropriate health care
provider or health care facility, or both, equipped to
address the client's health care needs;
(14) Initiating and maintaining accurate records;
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 6

Page 7
H.B. NO.
S.D. 3
(15) Admitting and discharging clients for inpatient care
at freestanding birthing facilities licensed in the
State;
(16) Participating in joint and periodic evaluation of
services rendered such as peer review, including chart
reviews, case reviews, client evaluations, and outcome
of case statistics;
(17) Ordering, interpreting, and performing diagnostic,
screening, and therapeutic examinations, tests, and
procedures as authorized pursuant to this chapter and
within the midwife's role, education, and
certification, excluding the performance, supervision,
and interpretation of procedures utilizing ionizing
radiation; and
(18) Use of reasonable judgment in carrying out prescribed
medical orders of a physician or osteopathic physician
licensed pursuant to chapter 453 or an advanced
practice registered nurse licensed pursuant to
chapter 457, orders of a physician assistant licensed
and practicing with physician supervision pursuant to
chapter 453 and acting as the agent of the supervising
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx

Page 8
H.B. NO. K?*
S.D. 3
physician, or orders of a midwife in accordance with
this chapter.
(b) The scope of practice of midwifery as a certified
midwife includes but is not limited to:
(1) Assessing and diagnosing clients and the prescription,
selection, and administration of therapeutic measures,
including over the counter drugs or legend drugs, or
both, according to this chapter; the provision of
expedited partner therapy pursuant to section 453-52;
and controlled substances within the certified
midwife's education, certification, and role and in
accordance with this chapter;
(2) Complying with the Standards for the Practice of
Midwifery, or successor document, of the American
College of Nurse-Midwives and American Midwifery
Certification Board, or successor organizations;
provided that the American College of Nurse-Midwives
and American Midwifery Certification Board shall have
no legal authority over the director and shall have no
legal authority or powers of oversight of the director
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 8
iiiiiiiiiniiiiiiiMuiiiiinniiiii

Page 9 1194
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 3
in the exercise of the director's powers and duties
authorized by law;
(3) Assisting in surgery; and
(4) Admitting and discharging clients for inpatient care
at facilities licensed in the State as hospitals.
(c) The scope of practice of midwifery as a certified
professional midwife includes but is not limited to:
(1) Assessing and diagnosing clients and the selection and
administration of therapeutic measures according to
the formulary authorized by section 457J-11 within the
certified professional midwife's education,
certification, and role; and
(2) Complying with the Essential Competencies for
Midwifery Practice, or successor document, as defined
by the International Confederation of Midwives, or
successor organization; provided that the
International Confederation of Midwives shall have no
legal authority over the director and shall have no
legal authority or powers of oversight of the director
in the exercise of the director's powers and duties
authorized by law,
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx

Page 10
H.B. NO.
(d) A midwife shall comply with the requirements of this
chapter; recognize limits of the midwife's training and
experience and have transfer of care protocols for situations
that exceed the scope of authorized practice; consult with or
refer clients to other health care providers, as appropriate;
and participate in data submission and peer review requirements
adopted by the department; provided that peer review conducted
outside of the department shall not be used to replace
investigations against a midwife licensed pursuant to this
chapter by the regulated industries complaints office of the
department.
§457J-B Care provided by midwives; requirements. (a) A
midwife shall continually assess the appropriateness of the
planned location of birth and shall refer to the American
College of Nurse-Midwives Clinical Bulletin Number 61:
Midwifery Provision of Home Birth Services (November 2015), or
succeeding document, for guidance, taking into account the
health and condition of the midwife's client; provided that the
American College of Nurse-Midwives shall have no legal authority
or powers of oversight over the director in the exercise of the
director's powers and duties authorized by law.
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 10
IlilliilililllMIII

Page 11
H.B. NO. S*!
h
(b) If the midwife determines that a condition of the
midwife's client or clients is outside of the midwife's scope of
practice, the midwife shall refer the client or clients to an
appropriate health care provider or health care facility, or
both, equipped to address the client's health care needs;
provided that the midwife shall collaborate with the client or
clients or the client's guardian to document what factors will
necessitate a change in birth settings to an emergency setting
in response to emerging conditions outside the scope of practice
of the midwife.
(c) If the midwife is attending a birth at a location
without a physician and an operating room and determines during
the midwife's care that the client or clients face imminent
morbidity or mortality, the midwife shall activate the 911
system and initiate transfer of care protocols.
(d) If the midwife transfers care of the midwife's client
or clients during the intrapartum or immediate postpartum
period, the midwife shall provide the receiving provider with,
at minimum, the information regarding the midwife's client or
clients listed on the transfer form adopted by the department.
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx

Page 12
H.B. NO.
S.D. 3
The transfer form may include reasons for the transfer, brief
relevant clinical history, and planned mode of transport.
(e) If the midwife's client or the midwife's client's
guardian declines assistance from appropriate licensed health
care providers or the 911 system, the midwife shall continually
urge the client or the client's guardian to transfer care to an
appropriate licensed health care provider and may continue to
provide care to save the life of the client or the newborn;
provided that the midwife shall only perform actions within the
midwife's scope of practice.
§457J-C License renewal continuing education requirement.
(a) Beginning July 1, 2026, each midwife shall provide
documentation of successful completion of thirty contact hours
during the prior triennium of appropriate continuing education
that is related to the practice of midwifery.
(b) Each licensee practicing as a certified midwife shall
provide documentation of successful completion of continuing
education that is from accredited colleges or universities or
approved by an organization recognized by the Continuing
Education Policy, or successor document, of the American
Midwifery Certification Board, or successor organization;
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 12

Page 13 1194
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 3
provided that a minimum of eight hours of continuing education
shall be in pharmacology.
(c) Each licensee practicing as a certified professional
midwife shall provide documentation of successful completion of
continuing education that is from an accredited college or
university or granted by an accrediting organization recognized
by the North American Registry of Midwives, or successor
organization; provided that six hours of continuing education
shall include treatment of shock and intravenous therapy and
suturing.
(d) This section shall not apply to a licensee who has
graduated from a midwifery program approved by the director
within the twelve months before the renewal date of the
licensee's first license renewal period.
(e) The director may extend the deadline for compliance
with the continuing education requirements established by this
section on a case-by-case basis; provided that before the
expiration of a license, the midwife seeking an extension shall
submit a written request for the extension and any documentation
required by the director to substantiate the reason for an
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 13

Page 14
H.B. NO.
S.D. 3
extension of the deadline for compliance with the continuing
education requirements established by this section.
(f) Each licensee shall maintain the licensee's continuing
education records for no less than six years.
(g) The director may conduct random audits of licensees to
determine compliance with the continuing education requirement.
The director shall provide written notice of an audit to all
licensees randomly selected for audit. Within sixty days of
notification, the licensee shall provide the director with
documentation verifying compliance with the continuing education
requirement established by this section.
§457J-D Global signature authority. Midwives shall be
authorized to sign, certify, or endorse all documents relating
to health care provided for their clients within their scope of
practice, including temporary disability insurance forms,
verification and evaluation forms of the department of human
services, and verification and authorization forms of the
department of health; provided that nothing in this section
shall be construed to expand the scope of practice of midwifery.
§457J-E Prescriptive authority. (a) Prescriptive
authority shall be granted solely to midwives practicing as
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 1
lilllllHilliniBIIIHBIliB

Page 15
H.B. NO. E
certified midwives and shall not be granted to midwives
practicing as certified professional midwives. Midwives
practicing as certified midwives shall only prescribe those
drugs appropriate to midwifery care as recognized by the
director and in accordance with the current exclusionary
formulary defined by the board of nursing for advanced practice
registered nurses.
(b) Only a midwife practicing as a certified midwife may
communicate, represent, or imply in any manner, including
through the use of a sign, card, or device, that the person is a
midwife who is authorized to prescribe.
(c) A midwife practicing as a certified midwife shall
comply with all applicable federal and state laws, regulations,
and rules relating to the prescription, dispensing, and
administration of drugs. A midwife practicing as a certified
midwife shall only prescribe and administer over the counter
drugs, legend drugs, and controlled substances pursuant to this
chapter and chapter 329. A midwife practicing as a certified
midwife may request, receive, and dispense a manufacturer's
prepackaged samples of over the counter and non-controlled
legend drugs to patients under the midwife's care; provided that
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 15

Page 16
H.B. NO.
S.D. 3
the midwife practicing as a certified midwife shall not request,
receive, or sign for samples of controlled substances. A
midwife practicing as a certified midwife may prescribe, order,
and dispense medical devices and equipment that are appropriate
to the midwife's scope of practice and plan and initiate a
therapeutic regimen that includes nutritional, diagnostic, and
supportive services including home health care, hospice, and
physical and occupational health.
(d) Prescriptions issued by a midwife practicing as a
certified midwife shall be written in accordance with section
329-38 .
(e) It shall be a violation of this chapter for a midwife
practicing as a certified professional midwife to communicate,
represent, or imply in any manner, including through the use of
any sign, card, or device, that the person is a midwife with
prescriptive authority.
§457J-F Reporting requirements. (a) Every midwife who
does not possess professional liability insurance shall report
in writing any settlement or arbitration award of a claim or
action for damages for death or personal injury caused by
negligence, error, or omission in practice, or the unauthorized
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 16

Page 17
H.B. NO.
rendering of professional services. The report shall be
submitted to the director within thirty days after any written
settlement agreement has been reduced to writing and signed by
all the parties or within thirty days after service of the
arbitration award on the parties.
(b) Failure to comply with this section shall be an
offense punishable by a fine of no less than $100 for the first
offense, $250 to $500 for the second offense, and $500 to $1,000
for any subsequent offense.
§457J-G Peer review requirements; license renewal.
Beginning June 30, 2029, each midwife shall, as a condition of
license renewal:
(1) Participate in a Hawaii-based peer review during each
triennium subject to the requirements of section
624-25.5;
(2) Attest that the midwife has completed a peer review
for a minimum of five of the midwife's clinical cases
from the prior triennium, and if the intended place of
birth of the clinical case presented was not a birth
facility, the midwife shall complete that clinical
case peer review with at least two midwives licensed
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 17
■niHiHiiiaiiaiinn

Page 18
H.B. NO.
S.D. 3
in the State who were not involved in the clinical
cases under review; and
(3) Attest that the midwife has completed a peer review
within ninety days of any case that includes
conditions outside of the midwife's scope of practice;
uterine rupture; or maternal or neonatal
hospitalization for infection, blood transfusion,
intensive care unit admission, infant failure to
thrive, neonatal Apgar Score of less than seven at
five minutes, emergent transfer of care, or mortality.
(b) If the midwife has served fewer than five clients in
the prior triennium, the requirements of subsection (a)(2) may
be waived upon a determination by the department; provided that
if the requirements of subsection (a)(2) are waived, the midwife
shall participate in the review of five cases of another midwife
practicing in the State.
(c) The midwife shall receive written confirmation of
participation in a Hawaii-based peer review process and shall
maintain copies of the midwife's participation records.
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 18
wiwiiMiMBinim

Page 19
H.B. NO.
S.D. 3
§457J-H Data Bubmlssion requirements; license renewal.
(a) The department may require a midwife, as a condition of
license renewal, to:
(1) Submit data to an organization approved by the
department for every gestational parent and newborn
under the midwife's care when the intended place of
birth at any point in care is not a birth facility.
If a gestational parent declines to participate in the
collection of data, the midwife shall follow the
protocol established by the department; and
(2) Attest that the midwife has submitted data annually
during the prior triennium.
(b) The data submission requirements may be waived if the
midwife attests that the midwife has not provided midwifery care
to any clients during the prior triennium or that the intended
place of birth for all clients of the midwife was a birth
facility throughout the duration of care.
(c) The midwife shall receive written confirmation of
participation in data submission from the department-approved
organization and shall maintain copies of the midwife's
participation records."
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx

Page 20
H.B. NO. |2
h
SECTION 3. Section 26H-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows;
"§26H-4 Repeal dates for newly enacted professional and
vocational regulatory programs. [4a-)-] Any professional or
vocational regulatory program enacted after January 1, 1994, and
listed in this section shall be repealed as specified in this
section. The auditor shall perform an evaluation of the
program, pursuant to section 26H-5, before its repeal date.
[4te^-- Chapter 457J—(midwiveo)—oha-ll- be repealed on—June 30,
■2-02-^] "
SECTION 4. Section 329-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted
and to read:
""Licensed midwife practicing as a certified midwife" means
a person licensed under chapter 457J who is registered under
this chapter to administer or prescribe a controlled substance;
provided that a licensed midwife practicing as a certified
midwife shall not be authorized to request, receive, or sign for
professional controlled substance samples.”
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 20
liiiiliiMiiiiiiniMBniii

Page 21
H.B. NO.
2. By amending the definition of "designated member of the
health care team" to read:
""Designated member of the health care team" includes
physician assistants, advanced practice registered nurses,
licensed midwives practicing as certified midwives, and covering
physicians who are authorized under state law to prescribe
drugs."
3. By amending the definition of "practitioner" to read:
""Practitioner" means:
(1) A physician, dentist, veterinarian, scientific
investigator, or other person licensed and registered
under section 329-32 to distribute, dispense, or
conduct research with respect to a controlled
substance in the course of professional practice or
research in this State;
(2) An advanced practice registered nurse with
prescriptive authority licensed and registered under
section 329-32 to prescribe and administer controlled
substances in the course of professional practice in
this State; [and]
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 21

Page 22
H.B. NO.
(3) A licensed midwife practicing as a certified midwife
registered under section 329-32 to prescribe and
administer controlled substances in the course of
professional practice in this State; and
(4) A pharmacy, hospital, or other institution
licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to
distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to
or to administer a controlled substance in the course
of professional practice or research in this State."
SECTION 5. Section 453-51, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the definition of "health professional" to
read as follows:
""Health professional" means any of the following:
(1) A person licensed or otherwise authorized by law to
practice medicine or surgery under this chapter and
whose scope of practice includes the diagnosis and
treatment of sexually transmitted diseases;
(2) An advanced practice registered nurse with
prescriptive authority under chapter 457 and duly
licensed in the State; [©r]
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.doCX
iiiiBiiiiHiiniiiiiiiBiiiiHiiniii

Page 23
H.B. NO.
(3) A licensed midwife practicing as a certified midwife
with prescriptive authority under chapter 457J and
duly licensed in the State; or
[-{-3-)-] (4) For the purpose of dispensing antibiotic therapy
S under this section, a pharmacist who is licensed or
otherwise authorized to engage in the practice of
pharmacy under chapter 461."
SECTION 6. Section 457J-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [4] §457J-1 [4-] Findings and purpose. The legislature
finds that:
(1) Midwives offer reproductive health care and maternity
and newborn care [from-the antepartum period through
the int-rapartum period to the postpartum, period;] to
clients seeking midwifery services;
(2) The improper practice of midwifery poses a significant
risk of harm to [the -mother or newborn,] any client
receiving midwifery services and may result in death;
and
(3) The regulation of the practice of midwifery is
reasonably necessary to protect the health, safety.
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 23
■BinimniiiiHiiiM

Page 24 1194
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 3
and welfare of [mothoro] persons choosing midwifery-
services and their newborns."
SECTION 7. Section 457J-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By adding five new definitions to be appropriately
inserted and to read:
""American College of Nurse-Midwives" means the
professional association that represents and sets the standards
for practice through core competencies and scope of practice for
certified nurse-midwives and certified midwives in the United
States■
"Birth facility" means a hospital or a freestanding
birthing facility licensed in the State.
"Peer review" means the candid review and evaluation,
subject to section 624-25.5, of the practice of midwifery.
"Peer review" includes but is not limited to reviewing the care
provided by midwives, making recommendations for quality
improvement, and identifying areas where additional education or
skills training is needed.
"Practice of midwifery" means the independent provision of
care, including initial and ongoing comprehensive assessment,
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 24

Page 25
H.B. NO.
-2
S D 3
diagnosis, and treatment during pregnancy, childbirth, the
postpartum period, and for healthy newborns; sexual and
reproductive health; gynecologic health; and family planning
services, including preconception care according to the
midwife's scope of practice for all persons seeking midwifery
care in all settings through the performance of professional
services commensurate with the educational preparation and
demonstrated competency of the individual having specialized
training, and skill based on the principles of the biological,
physical, behavioral, and sociological sciences and midwifery
theory, whereby the individual shall be accountable and
responsible to the client for the quality of midwifery care
rendered. "Practice of midwifery" does not include Native
Hawaiian traditional and customary practices as protected under
article XII, section 7, of the Hawaii State Constitution.
"Telehealth" means the use of telecommunications as defined
in section 269-1, to encompass four modalities--store and
forward technologies, remote monitoring, live consultation, and
mobile health--and which shall include but not be limited to
real-time video conferencing-based communication, secure
interactive and non-interactive web-based communication, and
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 25

Page 26
H.B. NO.
secure asynchronous information exchange, to transmit client
medical information, including diagnostic-quality digital images
and laboratory results for medical interpretation and diagnosis,
for the purposes of: delivering enhanced health care services
and information while a client is at an originating site and the
midwife is at a distant site; establishing a midwife-client
relationship; evaluating a client; or treating a client. Except
as provided through an interactive telecommunications system,
standard telephone contacts, facsimile transmissions, or e-mail
text, in combination or alone, do not constitute telehealth
services."
2. By amending the definitions of "certified midwife" and
"certified professional midwife" to read:
""Certified midwife" means a person who has graduated from
a graduate-level accredited educational program in midwifery,
accredited by the Accreditation Commission for Midwifery
Education, or successor organization, and who holds a current
and valid national certification as a certified midwife from the
American Midwifery Certification Board, or any successor
organization.
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 26

Page 27
H.B. NO.
S.D. 3
"Certified professional midwife" means a person who has
graduated from an accredited educational program or pathway in
midwifery, accredited by the Midwifery Education Accreditation
Council, or successor organization, and who holds a current and
valid national certification as a certified professional midwife
from the North American Registry of Midwives, or any successor
organization. A certified professional midwife who received
their certification through a non-accredited educational pathway
shall have obtained a midwifery bridge certificate from the
North American Registry of Midwives, or any successor
organization."
3. By amending the definitions of "interconception" and
"International Confederation of Midwives" to read:
""Interconception" means care provided to [mothers]
birthing people between pregnancies to improve health outcomes
for [women, ] birthing people and newborns [-;—and children] .
"International Confederation of Midwives" means the
accredited nongovernmental organization and representative of
midwives and midwifery to organizations worldwide to achieve
common goals in the care of [mefehea?©] birthing people and
newborns."
■ 202 ■ 5-2 ■ 63 ■ 8 ■ HB1 ■ 194 ■ S ■ D3 ■ SM ■ A.d ■ oc ■ x 27

Page 28
H.B. NO. E
4. By amending the definition of "postpartum" to read:
""Postpartum" means the period of time immediately after
and up to [eight] si^S weeks following [the] birth [ef—the
baby]."
5. By repealing the definition of "midwifery":
[ " ‘^Midwifery" meano the provision of one or more of the
teiiewiftg—setviees-:-
444- Aaeeooment,—monitoring,—and care during pregnancy,
■labor,—childbirth,—pootpartum and interconception
periods-;—and- for newborno,—including ordering and
interpreting □crconingc and diagnootic tcoto,—and
earryiRg—out—appropriate emergency mcaou-r-es-when
neccsaary;
iSi Suporvicing the conduct of labor and childbirth;—and
Provision of—advice and-information regarding the
progress of childbirth and-care for newborns and
infants."]
SECTION 8. Section 457J-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 28

Page 29 H.B. NO. '-
h
S.D. 3
" [4] §457J-6 [-3-] Exemptions. (a) [A pcroon may practice
midwifery without a iicenoc to -practice midwifery if the] This
chapter shall not apply to a person who is:
(1) A certified nurse-midwife holding a valid license
under chapter 457;
(2) Licensed and performing work within the scope of
practice or duties of the person's profession that
overlaps with the practice of midwifery; provided that
the person does not use the title "midwife", "licensed
midwife", or the abbreviation "L.M.", or any other
words, letters, abbreviations, or insignia indicating
or implying that the person is a midwife;
(3) A student [m-idwi-fe- who io] currently enrolled in a
midwifery educational program and under the direct
supervision of a qualified midwife preceptor; provided
that the practice of midwifery is incidental to the
program of study engaged by the student;
[-4 44 A pcroon-rendoring—aid in-an emergency where no feo
•fer^-fehe—serviee-4rs—eenfeempiafeed-;—eharged,—or -reeci-ved;

2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 29
MiiiiiiiiiHiiniiiMiiniii

Page 30
H.B. NO.
4-5 -)- A pcroon acting as—a--bi-gth-attendant - ©h—or before
Jsly 1,—2-&S3-;—who;
-{A4- Sees- net- uae-d:egend-dru-go-or ■ devices,—the-ase—e^-
which requires a license under the—laws of the
&tat-c y
-{•&)- Bees—not advertise that—the--persen—is a—licensed
midwife y
4€)- Discloses to each cl-i-eB-t-A^erbally- and in writing
on a form adopted by the department,—which shall
be received and executed by the -person under the
birth attendant-^s-—earo at the time-care is—first
initiated;
-(4-)- That the person docs not possess a
professional—l-i-cense issued by the State to
provide health or maternity-care to women or
■inf-antsy-
-(ii) That the person‘-s—edueat-ion and
qualifications have not-bcen reviewed by the
State y
44444- The person * s -education and-taraini-ng-y
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 30

Page 31
H.B. NO.
(■ iv-)- ■T-hafe--fehe—peraon io not authori-zed -fco
acquire,—carry,—admmi-st-er,—or direct othero
to adminiotcr logo-nd drugo;
- (v)- Any judgmcnt,—award-;—dioeiplinary ■ sanction,
order,—or other determination that adjudges
or- -f-i-nds that the person has committed
misconduct or is-criminaily or civilly
liab-le- for conduct relating to midwifery by
a-licenoing- or ■ regulatory auther-ity--
territory,—afeat-e-;—or any other jurisdiction;
y*» /*^
Cll XVI
- (-vi-)- A plan for transporting the client to the
nearest- hospital—if a problem arises during
the client-* s-oa-re-;—and
- (©j- Maintains a copy of the f or-m—r-equired-by
subparagraph——for at least ten ■years—and makes
the form available for inspection upon request by
the-depart-ment.
-Ch-)-- Nothing in this -chapter shall prohibit healing
practices by-traditional Hawaiian healers engaged in traditional
healing practices o-f-prenatal;—maternal-,—and child care as
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 31

Page 32
H.B. NO.
recognized by any council-ef -kupuna-Gonvened by Papa Ola Lokahi .-
Nothing in thia chapter ohall limit,—alter,—or^ofcherwine
adverseiy-arffipae-fe—the—praeti-ee——fe-raditional Native Hawaiian
hoaling-purouant to the Conotitution o£-t-he State of Hawaii.
4e^-- Nothing in thio chapter ohall prohibit a-peraon from
adminiotcring]
(4) Practicing Native Hawaiian traditional and customary
practices as protected under article XII, section 7,
of the Hawaii State Constitution;
(5) Providing services in the case of emergency or the
domestic administration of family remedies; or
(6) Administering care to [a] tl^ person's spouse,
domestic partner, parent, sibling, or child.
(b) It shall not be a violation of this chapter for a
person invited by a patient to be present at a birth occurring
at a location other than a birth facility; provided that the
person shall not use the title "midwife", "licensed midwife", or
engage in the practice of midwifery, unless otherwise licensed
under this chapter.
(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as
establishing any criminal penalty."
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 32
iiniinwiiiiiiiiiiiiiniiBiHiii

Page 33
H.B. NO. 2
hk
SECTION 9. Section 457J-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [4] S457J-8 (4-] Application for license as a midwife.
To obtain a license under this chapter, the applicant shall
provide:
(1) An application for licensure;
(2) The required fees;
[434 Proof-of eurrent,—unencumbered certification-ao-art-
- Gft4 Certified provess-i-onal m-idwife-;—or
- (-&4 Certified -midwife;
-(44 For- ce-rtif-ied^rofeosional- midwives,—proof—of—a
Gucceooful complefeion of a formal--midwifo-ry— eduoafion
and training program that io either;
■ 4A4 An educational program or pa-t-hwoy—aceredited by
the—Midwifery Education Accr-editation Councrl;—or
- (-84 A midwifery b-ridge eerfe-ifieafee—ieeeed—fey—fehe
North American RcgiG-fery of-Midwi-veo 4or certified
profeoe-ioftai—midwi-fe—app4ieaHt-s—who—eiffeer
©fefeained—eerfifieafe-ieii—feefore—daeaary—b;—2 02-0-,
through a non-accredited pathway>—or -who- have
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 33
iiiiiiiiMiiin

Page 34
H.B. NO. Si
ma-inta-i-ncd liccnaure in a otate that doeo not
require accredited education,-]
(3) A copy of current certification in adult and pediatric
cardiopulmonary resuscitation by the American Heart
Association, Red Cross, or American Safety and Health
Institute Basic Life Support that includes a hands-on
skill component; provided that the certification shall
be current at the time of licensure and the licensee
shall be responsible for maintaining current
certification throughout the license period;
(4) A copy of current certification in a neonatal
resuscitation program of the American Academy of
Pediatrics that includes a hands-on skills component;
provided that the certification shall be current at
the time of licensure and the licensee shall be
responsible for maintaining current certification
throughout the license period;
(5) If applicable, evidence of any licenses held or once
held in other jurisdictions indicating the status of
the license and documenting any disciplinary
proceedings pending or taken by any jurisdiction;
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 34

H.B. NO. T.
k
S.D. 3
(6) Information regarding any conviction of any crime
[wbiefe] that has not been annulled or expunged; [and]
(7) Any other information the department may require to
investigate the applicant's qualifications for
licensure[—]2
(8) Any additional requirements adopted by the director;
ar^
ill Evidence of qualifications for licensure.
(b) Evidence of qualifications for licensure as a
certified midwife shall consist of the following:
(1) Proof of current, unencumbered certification as a
certified midwife by the American Midwifery
Certification Board or a successor organization;
(2) Proof of successful completion of a graduate-level
midwifery program accredited by the Accreditation
Commission for Midwifery Education, or successor
organization, leading to a master's degree or higher
as a midwife; and
(3) Proof of successful completion of at least thirty
contact hours, as part of a master's degree program or
higher from a college or university accredited by the
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 35

Page 36
H.B. NO.
I---. • 2
Accreditation Commission for Midwifery Education, or
successor organization, of advanced pharmacology
education, including advanced pharmacotherapeutics
that is integrated into the curriculum, within three
years immediately preceding the date of application.
If the advanced pharmacology education in a master's
degree program was completed before the three-year
time period immediately preceding the date of
application, then one of the following shall be
completed within the three-year time period
immediately preceding the date of application for
initial prescriptive authority:
(A) At least thirty contact hours of advanced
pharmacology, including advanced
pharmacotherapeutics, from a college or
university accredited by the Accreditation
Commission for Midwifery Education, or successor
organization; or
(B) At least thirty contact hours of continuing
education in advanced pharmacology, including
advanced pharmacotherapeutics, approved by the
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 36

Page 37
H.B. NO.
Continuing Education Policy, or successor
document, of the American Midwifery Certification
Board, or successor organization; provided that
the continuing education pharmacology contact
hours shall be related to the applicant's scope
of midwifery practice.
(c) Evidence of qualifications for licensure as a
certified professional midwife shall consist of the following:
(1) Proof of current and valid certification as a
certified professional midwife by the North American
Registry of Midwives or a successor organization; and
(2) Proof of successful completion of a formal midwifery
education and training program as follows;
(A) A midwifery educational program or pathway
accredited by the Midwifery Education
Accreditation Council, or successor organization,
or another nationally recognized accrediting
agency approved by the United States Department
of Education; or
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 37

Page 38 1194
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 3
(B) A midwifery bridge certificate issued by the
North American Registry of Midwives, or successor
organization."
SECTION 10. Section 457J-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-t] S457J-10 [^-] Renewals. (a) Every license issued under
this chapter shall be renewed triennially on or before June 30,
with the first renewal deadline occurring on June 30, 2023.
Failure to renew a license shall result in a forfeiture of the
license. Licenses [whieh] that have been so forfeited may be
restored within one year of the expiration date upon payment of
renewal and penalty fees. Failure to restore a forfeited
license within one year of the date of its expiration shall
result in the automatic termination of the license. Relicensure
after termination shall require the person to apply as a new
applicant and again satisfy all licensing requirements in place
at the time of the new application.
(b) For each license renewal, the licensee shall:
(1) Pay all required nonrefundable fees;
(2J Submit a completed renewal application;
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 38

Page 39
H.B. NO. T2
h
S.D. 3
Provide documentation of successful completion during
the prior triennium of appropriate continuing
education as required pursuant to section 457J-C;
(4) Provide a copy of current certification in adult and
pediatric cardiopulmonary resuscitation by the
American Heart Association, Red Cross, or American
Safety and Health Institute Basic Life Support that
includes a hands-on skill component; provided that the
certification shall be current at the time of renewal
and the licensee shall be responsible for maintaining
current certification throughout the license period;
(5) Provide a copy of current certification in a neonatal
resuscitation program of the American Academy of
Pediatrics that includes a hands-on skills component;
provided that the certification shall be current at
the time of renewal and the licensee shall be
responsible for maintaining current certification
throughout the license period;
(6) By June 30, 2029, and every triennium thereafter,
complete the peer review requirements under section
457J-G2 a^
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx :

Page 40
H.B. NO.
(7) Submit data to an organization approved by the
department as may be required under section 457J-H."
SECTION 11. Section .457J-11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows;
" [4] §457J-11 [1-] Authority to purchase and administer
certain legend drugs and devices. (a) A midwife licensed under
this chapter may purchase and administer non-controlled legend
drugs and devices that are used in pregnancy, birth, postpartum
care, newborn care, or resuscitation, and that are deemed
integral to providing care to the public by the department.
(b) Legend drugs authorized under subsection (a) are
limited for:
(1) Neonatal use to prophylactic ophthalmic medications,
vitamin K, epinephrine for neonatal resuscitation per
neonatal resuscitation guidelines, and oxygen; and
(2) Maternal use to antibiotics for Group B Streptococcal
antibiotic prophylaxis per guidelines adopted by the
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention [—]£
postpartum antihemorrhagics[—]^ Rho(D) immune
globulin [—] 2. epinephrine for anaphylactic reaction to
an administered medication[—] ; intravenous fluids [-] ;
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 40

Page 41
H.B. NO. J
h i
amino amide local anesthetic [—] ; nitrous oxide for
pain relief when used in a birth facility and in
accordance with facility policies; non-hormonal
contraceptives; hormonal implants pursuant to any
manufacturer certification requirements, as prescribed
by a licensed health care provider with prescriptive
authority under this chapter, chapter 453, or section
457-8.6; and oxygen.
Legend drugs authorized under subsection (a) shall not be used
to induce, stimulate, or augment labor during the first or
second stages of labor or before labor.
(c) Legend devices authorized under subsection (a) are
limited to devices for:
(1) Injection of medications;
(2) The administration of intravenous fluids;
(3) Adult and infant resuscitation;
(4) Rupturing amniotic membranes;
(5) Repairing vaginal tears; [and]
(6) Postpartum hemorrhage [-r] ; and
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 41

Page 42
H.B. NO.
(7) Mechanical, non-pharmacologic cervical dilation when
used at or after thirty-nine weeks gestation in
pregnancy.
(d) A pharmacist who dispenses drugs and devices to a
midwife as authorized by this section and in conformity with
chapter 461 is not liable for any adverse reactions caused by
the midwife's administration of legend drugs and devices.
(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude a midwife
practicing as a certified professional midwife from carrying out
the prescribed medical orders of a physician or osteopathic
physician licensed pursuant to chapter 453 or advanced practice
registered nurse licensed pursuant to chapter 457; orders of a
physician assistant licensed and practicing with physician
supervision pursuant to chapter 453, and acting as the agent of
the supervising physician; or orders of a recognized midwife
practicing as a certified midwife in accordance with this
chapter."
SECTION 12. Section 457J-12, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"[4]S457J-12[4] Grounds for refusal to grant, renew,
reinstate, or restore licenses and for revocation, suspension.
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 42

Page 43
H.B. NO. ■
denial, or condition of licenses. In addition to any other acts
or conditions provided by law, the director may refuse to grant,
renew, reinstate, or restore, or may deny, revoke, suspend, or
condition in any manner, any license for any one or more of the
following acts or conditions on the part of the licensee or the
applicant thereof:
(1) Failing to meet or maintain the conditions and
requirements necessary to qualify for the granting of
a license;
(2) Failing to notify the department in writing that the
licensee's certification as a certified professional
midwife or as a certified midwife is no longer current
or unencumbered within thirty days of the change in
status;
(3) Engaging in false, fraudulent, or deceptive
advertising, or making untruthful or improbable
statements;
(4) Being addicted to, dependent on, or a habitual user of
[a narcotic,—barbiturate,—amphetamine-,—hallucinogen,
opium-—or cocaine,—or other drugs or de-r-ivativcn of a
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 43
inHIHIIIIIIH

Page 44 1194
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 3
oimilar--na-t-u-re,•■] illicit substances, or abusing
controlled substances, or both;
(5) Practicing as a [licensed] midwife while impaired by^
at minimum, alcohol, drugs, non-accommodated physical
disability, or mental instability;
(6) Procuring a license through fraud, misrepresentation,
or deceit;
(7) Aiding and abetting an unlicensed person to directly
or indirectly perform activities requiring a
license[-r] , notwithstanding the delegation of
administrative and technical clinical tasks of
midwifery practice;
(8) Engaging in professional misconduct as defined by the
program in accordance with its own rules,
incompetence, gross negligence, or manifest incapacity
in the practice of midwifery;
(9) Failing to maintain a record or history of competency,
trustworthiness, fair dealing, and financial
integrity;
(10) Engaging in conduct or practice contrary to recognized
standards of ethics for the practice of midwifery;
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 44

Page 45
H.B. NO. T|
h
(11) Violating any condition or limitation upon which a
conditional license was issued;
(12) Engaging in business under a past or present license
issued pursuant to this chapter, in a manner causing
injury to one or more members of the public;
(13) Failing to comply, observe, or adhere to any law in a
manner such that the director deems the applicant or
licensee to be an unfit or improper person to hold a
license;
(14) Having a revocation, suspension, or other disciplinary
action by a territory, or by another state or federal
agency against a licensee or applicant for any reason
provided by the licensing laws or this section;
(15) Having a criminal conviction, whether by nolo
contendere or otherwise, of a penal crime directly
related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of
a [-tteen&ed] midwife;
(16) Failing to report in writing to the director any
disciplinary decision issued against the licensee or
the applicant in another jurisdiction within thirty
days of the disciplinary decision;
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 45
liniiiiiiiiiHiiiwiiiiniittiiiiii

Page 46
H.B. NO. E
(17) Employing, utilizing, or attempting to employ or
utilize at any time any person not licensed under this
chapter where licensure is required;
(18) Violating this chapter, any other applicable licensing
laws, or any rule or order of the director; [er]
(19) Using or removing without authorization controlled
substances or drugs, including diverting or attempting
to divert drugs or controlled substances for
unauthorized use [—]£
(20) Failing to maintain current and valid certification in
adult and pediatric cardiopulmonary resuscitation of
by the American Heart Association, Red Cross, or
American Safety and Health Institute Basic Life
Support that includes a hands-on skill component; or
(21) Failing to maintain current and valid certification in
a neonatal resuscitation program of the American
Academy of Pediatrics that includes a hands-on skills
component."
SECTION 13. Section 671-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the definition of "health care provider" to
read as follows:
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 46

Page 47
H.B. NO.
""Health care provider" means a physician, osteopathic
physician, surgeon, or physician assistant licensed under
chapter 453 [-—a] 2. podiatrist licensed under chapter 463EE-;—a] 2.
health care facility as defined in section 323D-2 [-] ; midwife
licensed under chapter 457J; and the employees of any of them.
Health care provider shall not mean any nursing institution or
nursing service conducted by and for those who rely upon
treatment by spiritual means through prayer alone, or employees
of the institution or service."
SECTION 14. This Act does not affect rights and duties
that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that
were begun before its effective date.
SECTION 15. In codifying the new sections added by
section 2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute
appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating
the new sections in this Act.
SECTION 16. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 17. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2638 HB1194 SD3 SMA.docx 47

H.B. NO.
S.D.3
APPROVED this day of , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

H.B. No. 1194, H.D. 2, S.D. 3
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: April 10, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
President of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate


HBNo. 1194, HD 2, SD 3
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 14, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine R. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives